Utah statutes.
23-20-13.   Signs or equipment -- Damage or destruction unlawful.

 A person may not:

(1)  shoot at, shoot, deface, damage, remove, or destroy any division signs or placards  located in any part of this state; or

(2)  damage, destroy, remove, or cause to be damaged, destroyed, or removed any equipment or devices owned, controlled, or operated by the Division of Wildlife Resources.



Amended by Chapter 23, 1995 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 211, 1995 General Session

